Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,134
Adult education; classes; authorized.

School boards and boards of education may expend money for conducting schools and classes in school buildings, industrial establishments, places of employment, and such other places as may be expedient for the purpose of giving instruction to persons described in section 79-11,133. Such courses of instruction or study may include basic educational skills, English, history, civics, and other subjects tending to promote good citizenship and to increase vocational efficiency.

Laws 1927, c. 82, § 2, p. 248;

C.S.1929, § 79-2302;

R.S.1943, § 79-2302;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 405, p. 827;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1416;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 916.